test/src/morphology/N-pool_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - põõˊl e-stem pöly: # Noun - full paradigm
     põõˊl+N+Sg+Nom: põõˊl
     põõˊl+N+Sg+Gen: põõˊl
     põõˊl+N+Sg+Acc: põõˊl
     põõˊl+N+Sg+Ill: põõˊle
     põõˊl+N+Sg+Loc: põõˊlest
     põõˊl+N+Sg+Com: põõˊlin
     põõˊl+N+Ess: põõˊlen
     põõˊl+N+Par: põõˊled
     põõˊl+N+Sg+Abe: põõˊltää
     põõˊl+N+Pl+Nom: põõˊl
     põõˊl+N+Pl+Gen: põõˊli
     põõˊl+N+Pl+Acc: põõˊlid
     põõˊl+N+Pl+Ill: põõˊlid
     põõˊl+N+Pl+Loc: põõˊlin
     põõˊl+N+Pl+Com: põõˊlivuiˊm
     põõˊl+N+Pl+Abe: põõˊlitää
